West Virginia, session 2025, HB3015.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 3C. WEST VIRGINIA COMPUTER CRIME AND ABUSE ACT. §61-3C-14b. Soliciting, etc. a minor via computer; soliciting a minor and traveling to engage the minor in prohibited sexual activity; definition of minor; penalties. (a) Any person over the age of 18, who knowingly uses a computer to solicit, entice, seduce, or lure, or attempt to solicit, entice, seduce or lure, a minor known or believed to be at least four years younger than the person using the computer in order to engage in any illegal act proscribed by the provisions of §61-8-1 et seq., §61-8B-1 et seq., §61-8C-1 et seq., or §61-8D-1 et seq. of this code, or any felony offense under §60A-4-401 of this code, is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than $5,000 or imprisoned in a state correctional facility not less than two nor more than ten years, or both fined and imprisoned.(b) Any person violating the provisions of subsection (a) of this section who engages in any overt act designed to bring himself or herself into the minor’s, or a person believed to be a minor’s physical presence with the intent to engage in any sexual activity or conduct with such a minor that is prohibited by law, is guilty of a felony and shall be fined not more than $25,000 or imprisoned in a state correctional facility for a determinate sentence of not less than five nor more than 30 years, or both fined and imprisoned : Provided, That subsection (a) of this section shall be deemed a lesser included offense to that created by this subsection.(c) For purposes of this section, "minor" means a person younger than 18 years of age, or a person representing himself or herself to be a minor. Any prosecution, pursuant to this article, relating to a person representing himself or herself to be a minor shall be limited to investigations being conducted  or overseen by law enforcement officers.